Utah statutes.
63I-4-301.   Board to create inventory.
(1)  By no later than June 30, 2009, the board shall create an inventory of
activities of the agencies in this state to classify whether each activity is:
(a)  a commercial activity; or
(b)  an inherently governmental activity.
(2)  The board shall update the inventory created under this section at least
every two years.
(3)  The board shall make the inventory available to the public through
electronic means.
